Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB939.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "perform" or "performance" in section 2 of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Content creator." An individual who creates, posts, shares or otherwise interacts with digital content on an online platform and engages in a direct contractual relationship with 1234567891011121314151617181920 third parties. The term shall include a vlogger, a podcaster, a social media influencer, a streamer and an individual using an online platform for profit.* * *"Online content." Information and media created by a content creator for the purpose of sharing on an online platform."Online platform." A public-facing Internet website, web application or digital application. The term shall include a social media platform, an advertising network, a mobile application, a mobile operating system, a search engine, an email service and an Internet access service."Perform" or "performance." The providing of artistic or creative services to a live audience or recorded for exhibition or broadcast to an audience. This term shall include modeling and acting as a content creator.* * *Section 2. Section 5(e)(2) of the act is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 5. Employment of minors in a performance.* * *(e) Child performer trust account.--* * *(2) All of the following govern the child performer trust account or qualified tuition program established under paragraph (1):* * *(xii) A child performer trust account shall be administered by a fiduciary, whose primary responsibility shall be to act in the best interest of the child performer for the purpose of providing benefits and 20250HB0939PN1005 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paying account expenses on behalf of the child performer.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.1. Employment of minors as content creators.(a) Characteristics of content creator.--(1) A minor is a content creator if the minor models or renders artistic or creative expression on an online platform that expressly depends upon the minor's participation, which is substantial and for which any person receives remuneration for the minor's participation.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1):(i) "Remuneration" shall include one or more monetary payments but shall not include reimbursement for expenses incurred by the minor or the minor's family or any prize or goods or services received in connection with the participation with a value of less than $2,500.(ii) "Substantial" shall mean the minor is a principal subject of the online content or the minor participates in the creation of the online content for ten or more days in a 30-day period.(b) Child performer trust account.--(1) An irrevocable child performer trust account or a qualified tuition program established and maintained in accordance with section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 529) by this Commonwealth, another state, an agency or instrumentality of this Commonwealth or another state, or by one or more eligible educational institutions, shall be established for a minor if:(i) the minor is entitled to receive residuals in 20250HB0939PN1005 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with a principal agreement;(ii) earnings by the minor are anticipated to exceed $2,500 for the performance; or(iii) the minor has already earned in excess of $2,500 in prior employment in performance.(2) A child performer trust account established in another state shall meet the requirements of this subsection.(3) The following govern the child performer trust account or qualified tuition program established under paragraph (1):(i) The parent or legal guardian shall establish the child performer trust account or qualified tuition program for the benefit of the minor.(ii) The parent or legal guardian shall provide to the employer, on or before the start of paid employment, the information necessary to enable the employer to transfer money into the child performer trust account or qualified tuition program.(iii) The employer shall transfer to the child performer trust account or qualified tuition program not less than 15% of:(A) the total compensation prior to all taxes, deductions and commissions payable to the minor or the parent or legal guardian under contract; or(B) in the case of payment to a third party, the total compensation paid to the third party for the minor's services.(iv) In the case of employment for 30 days or less, the employer shall transfer the required amount to the child performer trust account or qualified tuition 20250HB0939PN1005 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program within 30 days of the final day of employment in accordance with 20 Pa.C.S. Ch. 53 (relating to Pennsylvania Uniform Transfers to Minors Act).(v) In the case of employment for longer than 30 days, the employer shall transfer the required amount to the child performer trust account or qualified tuition program every payroll period in accordance with 20 Pa.C.S. Ch. 53.(vi) If the employer has not been notified within 15 days of commencement of employment of the existence of a child performer trust account or qualified tuition program or if a child performer trust account or tuition account program has not been established by the parent or legal guardian, the employer shall transfer the required amount, along with the minor's name and last known address, to the Office of State Treasurer for placement into a child performer trust account for the benefit of the minor.(vii) Once the transfers have been made to the child performer trust account, qualified tuition program or the Office of State Treasurer in accordance with this subsection, the employer shall have no further duty under this subsection.(viii) The employer's obligations under this subsection shall terminate when the minor reaches 18 years of age.(ix) A duty under this subsection does not exist if the minor is emancipated.(x) The parent or legal guardian may serve as custodian under this subsection. If the child performer 20250HB0939PN1005 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 trust account reaches $150,000, or a higher amount as set by the department through regulation, a trust company or independent custodian shall be appointed.(xi) Proceeds of the child performer trust account:(A) Shall remain in trust until the minor reaches 18 years of age.(B) May only be distributed to the minor before the minor reaches 18 years of age for the minor's legitimate health and educational needs.(C) May remain in trust after the minor reaches 18 years of age if the parent or legal guardian determines that it would serve the health, education and financial interests of the minor.(xii) A child performer trust account shall be administered by a fiduciary, whose primary responsibility shall be to act in the best interest of the child performer for the purpose of providing benefits and paying account expenses on behalf of the child performer.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0939PN1005 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819